Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1304
Lease; cash rent; term; rules and regulations; cancellation of lease.

All publicly owned farm lands not classified as school or saline lands, or lands of the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Correctional Services, or the University of Nebraska shall be subject to lease at a fixed annual cash rental for a term of not more than ten years. The department, commission, or board shall have authority to adopt such rules and regulations as it shall deem necessary in the leasing of such lands and to prescribe such terms and conditions of the lease as it shall deem necessary to protect the interests of the state. All departments, boards, or commissions, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Correctional Services, and the University of Nebraska shall adopt and enforce a soil conservation program based on a conservation plan as developed by the local natural resources district. Failure of the lessee to utilize the land for the purpose for which the land was leased or to observe and carry out soil conservation requirements as provided in the rules and regulations of the department, commission, or board shall be cause for cancellation of the lease.

Laws 1967, c. 461, § 4, p. 1432;

Laws 1969, c. 597, § 1, p. 2451;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 790.